Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,152
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-12,152 to 81-12,167 shall be known and may be cited as the Business Innovation Act.

Laws 2011, LB387, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB641, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB334, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB847, § 29.
July 18, 2026